src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON CIEZANUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
čiežanuppelohkái:či CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
čiežagoalmmátlohkái:či CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
čiežanjealjátlohkái:či CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
giežanuppelohkái:gi CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
giežagoalmmátlohkái:gi CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
giežanjealjátlohkái:gi CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
čiežanuppelohkái:či CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
čiežagoalmmátlohkái:či CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
čiežanjealjátlohkái:či CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
giežanuppelohkái:gi CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
giežagoalmmátlohkái:gi CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
giežanjealjátlohkái:gi CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
